Illinois, session 104th, HB5494.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems 5Act is amended by changing Sections 3.116, 3.117, 3.117.5, 63.118, and 3.118.5 as follows: 7    (210 ILCS 50/3.116)8    Sec. 3.116. Hospital Stroke Care; definitions. As used in 9Sections 3.116 through 3.119, 3.130, and 3.200 of this Act:10    "Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital" means a hospital that has 11been designated by the Department as meeting the criteria for 12providing emergent stroke care. Designation may be provided 13after a hospital has been certified or through application and 14designation as such. 15    "Certification" or "certified" means certification, using 16evidence-based standards, from a nationally recognized 17certifying body approved by the Department.18    "Comprehensive Stroke Center" means a hospital that has 19been certified and has been designated as such.20    "Designation" or "designated" means the Department's 21recognition of a hospital as a Comprehensive Stroke Center, 22Primary Stroke Center, or Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital.23    "Emergent stroke care" is emergency medical care that   HB5494 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1includes diagnosis and emergency medical treatment of acute 2stroke patients.3    "Emergent Stroke Ready Hospital" means a hospital that has 4been designated by the Department as meeting the criteria for 5providing emergent stroke care.6    "Primary Stroke Center" means a hospital that has been 7certified by a Department-approved, nationally recognized 8certifying body and designated as such by the Department.9    "Primary Stroke Center Plus" means a hospital that has 10been certified by a Department-approved, nationally recognized 11certifying body and designated as such by the Department.12    "Regional Stroke Advisory Subcommittee" means a 13subcommittee formed within each Regional EMS Advisory 14Committee to advise the Director and the Region's EMS Medical 15Directors Committee on the triage, treatment, and transport of 16possible acute stroke patients and to select the Region's 17representative to the State Stroke Advisory Subcommittee. At 18minimum, the Regional Stroke Advisory Subcommittee shall 19consist of: one representative from the EMS Medical Directors 20Committee; one EMS coordinator from a Resource Hospital; one 21administrative representative or his or her designee from each 22level of stroke care, including Comprehensive Stroke Centers 23within the Region, if any, Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Centers 24within the Region, if any, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Centers 25within the Region, if any, Primary Stroke Centers Plus within 26the Region, if any, Primary Stroke Centers within the Region,   HB5494 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1if any, and Acute Stroke-Ready Hospitals within the Region, if 2any; one physician from each level of stroke care, including 3one physician who is a neurologist or who provides advanced 4stroke care at a Comprehensive Stroke Center in the Region, if 5any, one physician who is a neurologist or who provides acute 6stroke care at a Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Center within the 7Region, if any, a Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Center within the 8Region, if any, or a Primary Stroke Center Plus in the Region, 9if any, one physician who is a neurologist or who provides 10acute stroke care at a Primary Stroke Center in the Region, if 11any, and one physician who provides acute stroke care at an 12Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital in the Region, if any; one nurse 13practicing in each level of stroke care, including one nurse 14from a Comprehensive Stroke Center in the Region, if any, one 15nurse from a Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Center, if any, a 16Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Center within the Region, if any, or 17a Primary Stroke Center Plus in the Region, if any, one nurse 18from a Primary Stroke Center in the Region, if any, and one 19nurse from an Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital in the Region, if 20any; one representative from both a public and a private 21vehicle service provider that transports possible acute stroke 22patients within the Region; the State-designated regional EMS 23Coordinator; and a fire chief or his or her designee from the 24EMS Region, if the Region serves a population of more than 252,000,000. The Regional Stroke Advisory Subcommittee shall 26establish bylaws to ensure equal membership that rotates and   HB5494 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1clearly delineates committee responsibilities and structure. 2Of the members first appointed, one-third shall be appointed 3for a term of one year, one-third shall be appointed for a term 4of 2 years, and the remaining members shall be appointed for a 5term of 3 years. The terms of subsequent appointees shall be 3 6years.7    "State Stroke Advisory Subcommittee" means a standing 8advisory body within the State Emergency Medical Services 9Advisory Council.10    "Stroke certification" or "stroke-certified" means 11certification, using evidence-based standards, from a 12nationally recognized certifying body approved by the 13Department. 14    "Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Center" means a hospital that 15has been certified by a Department-approved, nationally 16recognized certifying body and designated as such by the 17Department.18    "Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Center" means a hospital that 19has been certified by a Department-approved, nationally 20recognized certifying body and designated as such by the 21Department. 22(Source: P.A. 102-687, eff. 12-17-21; 103-149, eff. 1-1-24; 23103-363, eff. 7-28-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 24    (210 ILCS 50/3.117)25    Sec. 3.117. Hospital designations.  HB5494 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1    (a) The Department shall attempt to designate Primary 2Stroke Centers in all areas of the State.3        (1) The Department shall designate as many certified 4    Primary Stroke Centers as apply for that designation 5    provided they are certified by a nationally recognized 6    certifying body, approved by the Department, and 7    certification criteria are consistent with the most 8    current nationally recognized, evidence-based stroke 9    guidelines related to reducing the occurrence, 10    disabilities, and death associated with stroke.11        (2) A hospital certified as a Primary Stroke Center by 12    a nationally recognized certifying body approved by the 13    Department, shall send a copy of the Certificate and 14    annual fee to the Department and shall be deemed, within 15    30 business days of its receipt by the Department, to be a 16    State-designated Primary Stroke Center.17        (3) A center designated as a Primary Stroke Center 18    shall pay an annual fee as determined by the Department 19    that shall be no less than $100 and no greater than $500. 20    All fees shall be deposited into the Stroke Data 21    Collection Fund.22        (3.5) With respect to a hospital that is a designated 23    Primary Stroke Center, the Department shall have the 24    authority and responsibility to do the following:25            (A) Suspend or revoke a hospital's Primary Stroke 26        Center designation upon receiving notice that the   HB5494 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1        hospital's Primary Stroke Center certification has 2        lapsed or has been revoked by the State recognized 3        certifying body.4            (B) Suspend a hospital's Primary Stroke Center 5        designation, in extreme circumstances where patients 6        may be at risk for immediate harm or death, until such 7        time as the certifying body investigates and makes a 8        final determination regarding certification.9            (C) Restore any previously suspended or revoked 10        Department designation upon notice to the Department 11        that the certifying body has confirmed or restored the 12        Primary Stroke Center certification of that previously 13        designated hospital.14            (D) Suspend a hospital's Primary Stroke Center 15        designation at the request of a hospital seeking to 16        suspend its own Department designation.17        (4) Primary Stroke Center designation shall remain 18    valid at all times while the hospital maintains its 19    certification as a Primary Stroke Center, in good 20    standing, with the certifying body. The duration of a 21    Primary Stroke Center designation shall coincide with the 22    duration of its Primary Stroke Center certification. Each 23    designated Primary Stroke Center shall have its 24    designation automatically renewed upon the Department's 25    receipt of a copy of the accrediting body's certification 26    renewal.  HB5494 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1        (5) A hospital that no longer meets nationally 2    recognized, evidence-based standards for Primary Stroke 3    Centers, or loses its Primary Stroke Center certification, 4    or has any change to its designation level shall notify 5    the Department and the Regional EMS Advisory Committee 6    within 5 business days.7    (a-5) The Department shall attempt to designate 8Comprehensive Stroke Centers in all areas of the State.9        (1) The Department shall designate as many certified 10    Comprehensive Stroke Centers as apply for that 11    designation, provided that the Comprehensive Stroke 12    Centers are certified by a nationally recognized 13    certifying body approved by the Department, and provided 14    that the certifying body's certification criteria are 15    consistent with the most current nationally recognized and 16    evidence-based stroke guidelines for reducing the 17    occurrence of stroke and the disabilities and death 18    associated with stroke.19        (2) A hospital certified as a Comprehensive Stroke 20    Center shall send a copy of the Certificate and annual fee 21    to the Department and shall be deemed, within 30 business 22    days of its receipt by the Department, to be a 23    State-designated Comprehensive Stroke Center.24        (3) A hospital designated as a Comprehensive Stroke 25    Center shall pay an annual fee as determined by the 26    Department that shall be no less than $100 and no greater   HB5494 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1    than $500. All fees shall be deposited into the Stroke 2    Data Collection Fund.3        (4) With respect to a hospital that is a designated 4    Comprehensive Stroke Center, the Department shall have the 5    authority and responsibility to do the following:6            (A) Suspend or revoke the hospital's Comprehensive 7        Stroke Center designation upon receiving notice that 8        the hospital's Comprehensive Stroke Center 9        certification has lapsed or has been revoked by the 10        State recognized certifying body.11            (B) Suspend the hospital's Comprehensive Stroke 12        Center designation, in extreme circumstances in which 13        patients may be at risk for immediate harm or death, 14        until such time as the certifying body investigates 15        and makes a final determination regarding 16        certification.17            (C) Restore any previously suspended or revoked 18        Department designation upon notice to the Department 19        that the certifying body has confirmed or restored the 20        Comprehensive Stroke Center certification of that 21        previously designated hospital.22            (D) Suspend the hospital's Comprehensive Stroke 23        Center designation at the request of a hospital 24        seeking to suspend its own Department designation.25        (5) Comprehensive Stroke Center designation shall 26    remain valid at all times while the hospital maintains its   HB5494 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1    certification as a Comprehensive Stroke Center, in good 2    standing, with the certifying body. The duration of a 3    Comprehensive Stroke Center designation shall coincide 4    with the duration of its Comprehensive Stroke Center 5    certification. Each designated Comprehensive Stroke Center 6    shall have its designation automatically renewed upon the 7    Department's receipt of a copy of the certifying body's 8    certification renewal.9        (6) A hospital that no longer meets nationally 10    recognized, evidence-based standards for Comprehensive 11    Stroke Centers, or loses its Comprehensive Stroke Center 12    certification, shall notify the Department and the 13    Regional EMS Advisory Committee within 5 business days.14    (a-7) The Department shall attempt to designate 15Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Centers, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke 16Centers, and Primary Stroke Centers Plus in all areas of the 17State according to the following requirements:18        (1) The Department shall designate as many certified 19    Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Centers, Thrombectomy Ready 20    Stroke Centers, and Primary Stroke Centers Plus as apply 21    for that designation, provided that the body certifying 22    the facility uses certification criteria consistent with 23    the most current nationally recognized and evidence-based 24    stroke guidelines for reducing the occurrence of strokes 25    and the disabilities and death associated with strokes.26        (2) A Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Center, Thrombectomy   HB5494 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1    Ready Stroke Center, or Primary Stroke Center Plus shall 2    send a copy of the certificate of its designation and 3    annual fee to the Department and shall be deemed, within 4    30 business days after its receipt by the Department, to 5    be a State-designated Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Center, 6    Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Center, or Primary Stroke Center 7    Plus.8        (3) A Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Center, Thrombectomy 9    Ready Stroke Center, or Primary Stroke Center Plus shall 10    pay an annual fee as determined by the Department that 11    shall be no less than $100 and no greater than $500. All 12    fees collected under this paragraph shall be deposited 13    into the Stroke Data Collection Fund.14        (4) With respect to a Thrombectomy Capable Stroke 15    Center, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Center, or Primary 16    Stroke Center Plus, the Department shall:17            (A) suspend or revoke the Thrombectomy Capable 18        Stroke Center, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Center, or 19        Primary Stroke Center Plus designation upon receiving 20        notice that the Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Center's, 21        Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Center's, or Primary Stroke 22        Center Plus's certification has lapsed or has been 23        revoked by its certifying body;24            (B) in extreme circumstances in which patients may 25        be at risk for immediate harm or death, suspend the 26        Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Center's, Thrombectomy   HB5494 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1        Ready Stroke Center's, or Primary Stroke Center Plus's 2        designation until its certifying body investigates the 3        circumstances and makes a final determination 4        regarding its certification;5            (C) restore any previously suspended or revoked 6        Department designation upon notice to the Department 7        that the certifying body has confirmed or restored the 8        Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Center's, Thrombectomy 9        Ready Stroke Center's, or Primary Stroke Center Plus's 10        certification; and11            (D) suspend the Thrombectomy Capable Stroke 12        Center's, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Center's, or 13        Primary Stroke Center Plus's designation at the 14        request of a facility seeking to suspend its own 15        Department designation.16        (5) A Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Center, Thrombectomy 17    Ready Stroke Center, or Primary Stroke Center Plus 18    designation shall remain valid at all times while the 19    facility maintains its certification as a Thrombectomy 20    Capable Stroke Center, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Center, 21    or Primary Stroke Center Plus and is in good standing with 22    the certifying body. The duration of a Thrombectomy 23    Capable Stroke Center, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Center, 24    or Primary Stroke Center Plus designation shall be the 25    same as the duration of its Thrombectomy Capable Stroke 26    Center, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Center, or Primary   HB5494 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1    Stroke Center Plus certification. Each designated 2    Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Center, Thrombectomy Ready 3    Stroke Center, or Primary Stroke Center Plus shall have 4    its designation automatically renewed upon the 5    Department's receipt of a copy of the certifying body's 6    renewal of the certification.7        (6) A hospital that no longer meets the criteria for 8    Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Centers, Thrombectomy Ready 9    Stroke Centers, or Primary Stroke Centers Plus, or loses 10    its Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Center, Thrombectomy Ready 11    Stroke Center, or Primary Stroke Center Plus 12    certification, shall notify the Department and the 13    Regional EMS Advisory Committee of the situation within 5 14    business days after being made aware of it. 15    (b) The Department shall consult with the State Stroke 16Advisory Subcommittee for the adoption or deletion of approved 17stroke designation levels. The approved stroke designation 18levels shall coincide with the stroke designation levels 19recognized by Department-approved certifying bodies. Beginning 20on the first day of the month that begins 12 months after the 21adoption of rules authorized by this subsection, the 22Department shall attempt to designate hospitals as Acute 23Stroke-Ready Hospitals in all areas of the State. Designation 24may be approved by the Department after a hospital has been 25certified as an Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital or through 26application and designation by the Department. For any   HB5494 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1hospital that is designated as an Emergent Stroke Ready 2Hospital at the time that the Department begins the 3designation of Acute Stroke-Ready Hospitals, the Emergent 4Stroke Ready designation shall remain intact for the duration 5of the 12-month period until that designation expires. Until 6the Department begins the designation of hospitals as Acute 7Stroke-Ready Hospitals, hospitals may achieve Emergent Stroke 8Ready Hospital designation utilizing the processes and 9criteria provided in Public Act 96-514.10        (1) (Blank).11        (2) Hospitals may apply for, and receive, Acute 12    Stroke-Ready Hospital designation from the Department, 13    provided that the hospital attests, on a form developed by 14    the Department in consultation with the State Stroke 15    Advisory Subcommittee, that it meets, and will continue to 16    meet, the criteria for Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital 17    designation and pays an annual fee.18        A hospital designated as an Acute Stroke-Ready 19    Hospital shall pay an annual fee as determined by the 20    Department that shall be no less than $100 and no greater 21    than $500. All fees shall be deposited into the Stroke 22    Data Collection Fund.23        (2.5) A hospital may apply for, and receive, Acute 24    Stroke-Ready Hospital designation from the Department, 25    provided that the hospital provides proof of current Acute 26    Stroke-Ready Hospital certification and the hospital pays   HB5494 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1    an annual fee.2            (A) Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital designation shall 3        remain valid at all times while the hospital maintains 4        its certification as an Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital, 5        in good standing, with the certifying body.6            (B) The duration of an Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital 7        designation shall coincide with the duration of its 8        Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital certification.9            (C) Each designated Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital 10        shall have its designation automatically renewed upon 11        the Department's receipt of a copy of the certifying 12        body's certification renewal and Application for 13        Stroke Center Designation form.14            (D) A hospital must submit a copy of its 15        certification renewal from the certifying body as soon 16        as practical but no later than 30 business days after 17        that certification is received by the hospital. Upon 18        the Department's receipt of the renewal certification, 19        the Department shall renew the hospital's Acute 20        Stroke-Ready Hospital designation.21            (E) A hospital designated as an Acute Stroke-Ready 22        Hospital shall pay an annual fee as determined by the 23        Department that shall be no less than $100 and no 24        greater than $500. All fees shall be deposited into 25        the Stroke Data Collection Fund.26        (3) Hospitals seeking Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital   HB5494 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1    designation that do not have certification shall develop 2    policies and procedures that are consistent with 3    nationally recognized, evidence-based protocols for the 4    provision of emergent stroke care. Hospital policies 5    relating to emergent stroke care and stroke patient 6    outcomes shall be reviewed at least annually, or more 7    often as needed, by a hospital committee that oversees 8    quality improvement. Adjustments shall be made as 9    necessary to advance the quality of stroke care delivered. 10    Criteria for Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital designation of 11    hospitals shall be limited to the ability of a hospital 12    to:13            (A) create written acute care protocols related to 14        emergent stroke care;15            (A-5) participate in the data collection system 16        provided in Section 3.118, if available;17            (B) maintain a written transfer agreement with one 18        or more hospitals that have neurosurgical expertise;19            (C) designate a Clinical Director of Stroke Care 20        who shall be a clinical member of the hospital staff 21        with training or experience, as defined by the 22        facility, in the care of patients with cerebrovascular 23        disease. This training or experience may include, but 24        is not limited to, completion of a fellowship or other 25        specialized training in the area of cerebrovascular 26        disease, attendance at national courses, or prior   HB5494 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1        experience in neuroscience intensive care units. The 2        Clinical Director of Stroke Care may be a neurologist, 3        neurosurgeon, emergency medicine physician, internist, 4        radiologist, advanced practice registered nurse, or 5        physician assistant;6            (C-5) provide rapid access to an acute stroke 7        team, as defined by the facility, that considers and 8        reflects nationally recognized, evidence-based 9        protocols or guidelines;10            (D) administer thrombolytic therapy, or 11        subsequently developed medical therapies that meet 12        nationally recognized, evidence-based stroke 13        guidelines;14            (E) conduct brain image tests at all times;15            (F) conduct blood coagulation studies at all 16        times;17            (G) maintain a log of stroke patients, which shall 18        be available for review upon request by the Department 19        or any hospital that has a written transfer agreement 20        with the Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital;21            (H) admit stroke patients to a unit that can 22        provide appropriate care that considers and reflects 23        nationally recognized, evidence-based protocols or 24        guidelines or transfer stroke patients to an Acute 25        Stroke-Ready Hospital, Primary Stroke Center, or 26        Comprehensive Stroke Center, or another facility that   HB5494 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1        can provide the appropriate care that considers and 2        reflects nationally recognized, evidence-based 3        protocols or guidelines; and4            (I) demonstrate compliance with nationally 5        recognized quality indicators.6        (4) With respect to Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital 7    designation, the Department shall have the authority and 8    responsibility to do the following:9            (A) Require hospitals applying for Acute 10        Stroke-Ready Hospital designation to attest, on a form 11        developed by the Department in consultation with the 12        State Stroke Advisory Subcommittee, that the hospital 13        meets, and will continue to meet, the criteria for an 14        Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital.15            (A-5) Require hospitals applying for Acute 16        Stroke-Ready Hospital designation via national Acute 17        Stroke-Ready Hospital certification to provide proof 18        of current Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital certification, 19        in good standing.20            The Department shall require a hospital that is 21        already certified as an Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital to 22        send a copy of the Certificate to the Department.23            Within 30 business days of the Department's 24        receipt of a hospital's Acute Stroke-Ready Certificate 25        and Application for Stroke Center Designation form 26        that indicates that the hospital is a certified Acute   HB5494 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1        Stroke-Ready Hospital, in good standing, the hospital 2        shall be deemed a State-designated Acute Stroke-Ready 3        Hospital. The Department shall send a designation 4        notice to each hospital that it designates as an Acute 5        Stroke-Ready Hospital and shall add the names of 6        designated Acute Stroke-Ready Hospitals to the website 7        listing immediately upon designation. The Department 8        shall immediately remove the name of a hospital from 9        the website listing when a hospital loses its 10        designation after notice and, if requested by the 11        hospital, a hearing.12            The Department shall develop an Application for 13        Stroke Center Designation form that contains a 14        statement that "The above named facility meets the 15        requirements for Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital 16        Designation as provided in Section 3.117 of the 17        Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act" and 18        shall instruct the applicant facility to provide: the 19        hospital name and address; the hospital CEO or 20        Administrator's typed name and signature; the hospital 21        Clinical Director of Stroke Care's typed name and 22        signature; and a contact person's typed name, email 23        address, and phone number.24            The Application for Stroke Center Designation form 25        shall contain a statement that instructs the hospital 26        to "Provide proof of current Acute Stroke-Ready   HB5494 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1        Hospital certification from a nationally recognized 2        certifying body approved by the Department".3            (B) Designate a hospital as an Acute Stroke-Ready 4        Hospital no more than 30 business days after receipt 5        of an attestation that meets the requirements for 6        attestation, unless the Department, within 30 days of 7        receipt of the attestation, chooses to conduct an 8        onsite survey prior to designation. If the Department 9        chooses to conduct an onsite survey prior to 10        designation, then the onsite survey shall be conducted 11        within 90 days of receipt of the attestation.12            (C) Require annual written attestation, on a form 13        developed by the Department in consultation with the 14        State Stroke Advisory Subcommittee, by Acute 15        Stroke-Ready Hospitals to indicate compliance with 16        Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital criteria, as described in 17        this Section, and automatically renew Acute 18        Stroke-Ready Hospital designation of the hospital.19            (D) Issue an Emergency Suspension of Acute 20        Stroke-Ready Hospital designation when the Director, 21        or his or her designee, has determined that the 22        hospital no longer meets the Acute Stroke-Ready 23        Hospital criteria and an immediate and serious danger 24        to the public health, safety, and welfare exists. If 25        the Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital fails to eliminate the 26        violation immediately or within a fixed period of   HB5494 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1        time, not exceeding 10 days, as determined by the 2        Director, the Director may immediately revoke the 3        Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital designation. The Acute 4        Stroke-Ready Hospital may appeal the revocation within 5        15 business days after receiving the Director's 6        revocation order, by requesting an administrative 7        hearing.8            (E) After notice and an opportunity for an 9        administrative hearing, suspend, revoke, or refuse to 10        renew an Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital designation, when 11        the Department finds the hospital is not in 12        substantial compliance with current Acute Stroke-Ready 13        Hospital criteria.14    (c) The Department shall consult with the State Stroke 15Advisory Subcommittee for developing the designation, 16re-designation, and de-designation processes of all stroke 17designation levels recognized by the Department for 18Comprehensive Stroke Centers, Thrombectomy Capable Stroke 19Centers, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Centers, Primary Stroke 20Centers Plus, Primary Stroke Centers, and Acute Stroke-Ready 21Hospitals.22    (d) The Department shall consult with the State Stroke 23Advisory Subcommittee as subject matter experts at least 24annually regarding stroke standards of care. 25(Source: P.A. 103-149, eff. 1-1-24; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.)   HB5494 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1    (210 ILCS 50/3.117.5)2    Sec. 3.117.5. Hospital Stroke Care; grants.3    (a) In order to encourage the establishment and retention 4of Comprehensive Stroke Centers, Thrombectomy Capable Stroke 5Centers, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Centers, Primary Stroke 6Centers Plus, Primary Stroke Centers, and Acute Stroke-Ready 7Hospitals throughout the State, the Director may award, 8subject to appropriation, matching grants to hospitals to be 9used for the acquisition and maintenance of necessary 10infrastructure, including personnel, equipment, and 11pharmaceuticals for the diagnosis and treatment of acute 12stroke patients. Grants may be used to pay the fee for 13certifications by Department approved nationally recognized 14certifying bodies or to provide additional training for 15directors of stroke care or for hospital staff.16    (b) The Director may award grant moneys to Comprehensive 17Stroke Centers, Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Centers, 18Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Centers, Primary Stroke Centers 19Plus, Primary Stroke Centers, and Acute Stroke-Ready Hospitals 20for developing or enlarging stroke networks, for stroke 21education, and to enhance the ability of the EMS System to 22respond to possible acute stroke patients.23    (c) A Comprehensive Stroke Center, Thrombectomy Capable 24Stroke Center, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Center, Primary 25Stroke Center Plus, Primary Stroke Center, or Acute 26Stroke-Ready Hospital, or a hospital seeking certification as   HB5494 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1a Comprehensive Stroke Center, Thrombectomy Capable Stroke 2Center, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Center, Primary Stroke 3Center Plus, Primary Stroke Center, or Acute Stroke-Ready 4Hospital or designation as an Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital, may 5apply to the Director for a matching grant in a manner and form 6specified by the Director and shall provide information as the 7Director deems necessary to determine whether the hospital is 8eligible for the grant.9    (d) Matching grant awards shall be made to Comprehensive 10Stroke Centers, Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Centers, 11Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Centers, Primary Stroke Centers 12Plus, Primary Stroke Centers, Acute Stroke-Ready Hospitals, or 13hospitals seeking certification or designation as a 14Comprehensive Stroke Center, Thrombectomy Capable Stroke 15Center, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Center, Primary Stroke 16Center Plus, Primary Stroke Center, or Acute Stroke-Ready 17Hospital. The Department may consider prioritizing grant 18awards to hospitals in areas with the highest incidence of 19stroke, taking into account geographic diversity, where 20possible.21(Source: P.A. 102-687, eff. 12-17-21; 103-149, eff. 1-1-24.) 22    (210 ILCS 50/3.118)23    Sec. 3.118. Reporting.24    (a) The Director shall, not later than July 1, 2012, 25prepare and submit to the Governor and the General Assembly a   HB5494 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1report indicating the total number of hospitals that have 2applied for grants, the project for which the application was 3submitted, the number of those applicants that have been found 4eligible for the grants, the total number of grants awarded, 5the name and address of each grantee, and the amount of the 6award issued to each grantee.7    (b) By July 1, 2010, the Director shall send the list of 8designated Comprehensive Stroke Centers, Thrombectomy Capable 9Stroke Centers, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Centers, Primary 10Stroke Centers Plus, Primary Stroke Centers, and Acute 11Stroke-Ready Hospitals to all Resource Hospital EMS Medical 12Directors in this State and shall post a list of designated 13Comprehensive Stroke Centers and Department-approved stroke 14levels , Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Centers, Thrombectomy 15Ready Stroke Centers, Primary Stroke Centers Plus, Primary 16Stroke Centers, and Acute Stroke-Ready Hospitals on the 17Department's website, which shall be continuously updated.18    (c) The Department shall add the names of designated 19Comprehensive Stroke Centers, Thrombectomy Capable Stroke 20Centers, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Centers, Primary Stroke 21Centers Plus, Primary Stroke Centers, and Acute Stroke-Ready 22Hospitals to the website listing immediately upon designation 23and shall immediately remove the name when a hospital loses 24its designation after notice and a hearing.25    (d) Stroke data collection systems and all stroke-related 26data collected from hospitals shall comply with the following   HB5494 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1requirements:2        (1) The confidentiality of patient records shall be 3    maintained in accordance with State and federal laws.4        (2) Hospital proprietary information and the names of 5    any hospital administrator, health care professional, or 6    employee shall not be subject to disclosure.7        (3) Information submitted to the Department shall be 8    privileged and strictly confidential and shall be used 9    only for the evaluation and improvement of hospital stroke 10    care. Stroke data collected by the Department shall not be 11    directly available to the public and shall not be subject 12    to civil subpoena, nor discoverable or admissible in any 13    civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding against a 14    health care facility or health care professional.15    (e) The Department may administer a data collection system 16to collect data that is already reported by designated 17Comprehensive Stroke Centers, Thrombectomy Capable Stroke 18Centers, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Centers, Primary Stroke 19Centers Plus, Primary Stroke Centers, and Acute Stroke-Ready 20Hospitals to their certifying body, to fulfill certification 21requirements. Comprehensive Stroke Centers, Thrombectomy 22Capable Stroke Centers, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Centers, 23Primary Stroke Centers Plus, Primary Stroke Centers, and Acute 24Stroke-Ready Hospitals may provide data used in submission to 25their current Stroke certifying body. The data collection 26system may be used , to satisfy any Department reporting   HB5494 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1requirements. The Department shall establish reporting 2requirements for designated Stroke Centers to capture 3information using new or existing electronic reporting tools 4for statewide data collection and certification purposes. 5Submission of such data elements shall be in a format that is 6used statewide The Department may require submission of data 7elements in a format that is used State-wide. In the event the 8Department establishes reporting requirements for designated 9Comprehensive Stroke Centers, Thrombectomy Capable Stroke 10Centers, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Centers, Primary Stroke 11Centers Plus, Primary Stroke Centers, and Acute Stroke-Ready 12Hospitals, the Department shall permit each designated 13Comprehensive Stroke Center, Thrombectomy Capable Stroke 14Centers, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Centers, Primary Stroke 15Centers Plus, Primary Stroke Center, or Acute Stroke-Ready 16Hospital to capture information using existing electronic 17reporting tools used for certification purposes. Nothing in 18this Section shall be construed to empower the Department to 19specify the form of internal recordkeeping. Three years from 20the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 96th General 21Assembly, the The Department may post the collected stroke 22data submitted by Comprehensive Stroke Centers, Thrombectomy 23Capable Stroke Centers, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Centers, 24Primary Stroke Centers Plus, Primary Stroke Centers, and Acute 25Stroke-Ready Hospitals on its website, subject to the 26following:  HB5494 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1        (1) Data collection and analytical methodologies shall 2    be used that meet accepted standards of validity and 3    reliability before any information is made available to 4    the public.5        (2) The limitations of the data sources and analytic 6    methodologies used to develop comparative hospital 7    information shall be clearly identified and acknowledged, 8    including, but not limited to, the appropriate and 9    inappropriate uses of the data.10        (3) To the greatest extent possible, comparative 11    hospital information initiatives shall use standard-based 12    norms derived from widely accepted provider-developed 13    practice guidelines.14        (4) Comparative hospital information and other 15    information that the Department has compiled regarding 16    hospitals shall be shared with the hospitals under review 17    prior to public dissemination of the information. 18    Hospitals have 30 days to make corrections and to add 19    helpful explanatory comments about the information before 20    the publication.21        (5) Comparisons among hospitals shall adjust for 22    patient case mix and other relevant risk factors and 23    control for provider peer groups, when appropriate.24        (6) Effective safeguards to protect against the 25    unauthorized use or disclosure of hospital information 26    shall be developed and implemented.  HB5494 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1        (7) Effective safeguards to protect against the 2    dissemination of inconsistent, incomplete, invalid, 3    inaccurate, or subjective hospital data shall be developed 4    and implemented.5        (8) The quality and accuracy of hospital information 6    reported under this Act and its data collection, analysis, 7    and dissemination methodologies shall be evaluated 8    regularly.9        (9) None of the information the Department discloses 10    to the public under this Act may be used to establish a 11    standard of care in a private civil action.12        (10) The Department shall disclose information under 13    this Section in accordance with provisions for inspection 14    and copying of public records required by the Freedom of 15    Information Act, provided that the information satisfies 16    the provisions of this Section.17        (11) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, under 18    no circumstances shall the Department disclose information 19    obtained from a hospital that is confidential under Part 20    21 of Article VIII of the Code of Civil Procedure.21        (12) No hospital report or Department disclosure may 22    contain information identifying a patient, employee, or 23    licensed professional.24(Source: P.A. 103-149, eff. 1-1-24.) 25    (210 ILCS 50/3.118.5)  HB5494 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1    Sec. 3.118.5. State Stroke Advisory Subcommittee; triage 2and transport of possible acute stroke patients.3    (a) There shall be established within the State Emergency 4Medical Services Advisory Council, or other statewide body 5responsible for emergency health care, a standing State Stroke 6Advisory Subcommittee, which shall serve as an advisory body 7to the Council and the Department on matters related to the 8triage, treatment, and transport of possible acute stroke 9patients. Membership on the Committee shall be as 10geographically diverse as possible and include one 11representative from each Regional Stroke Advisory 12Subcommittee, to be chosen by each Regional Stroke Advisory 13Subcommittee. The Director shall appoint additional members, 14as needed, to ensure there is adequate representation from the 15following:16        (1) an EMS Medical Director;17        (2) a hospital administrator, or designee, from a 18    Comprehensive Stroke Center;19        (2.5) a hospital administrator, or designee, from a 20    Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Center, Thrombectomy Ready 21    Stroke Center, or Primary Stroke Center Plus; 22        (3) a hospital administrator, or designee, from a 23    Primary Stroke Center;24        (3.5) a hospital administrator, or designee, from an 25    Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital;26        (3.10) a registered nurse from a Comprehensive Stroke   HB5494 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1    Center; 2        (3.15) a registered nurse from a Thrombectomy Capable 3    Stroke Center, Thrombectomy Ready Stroke Center, or 4    Primary Stroke Center Plus; 5        (4) a registered nurse from a Primary Stroke Center;6        (5) a registered nurse from an Acute Stroke-Ready 7    Hospital;8        (5.5) a physician providing advanced stroke care from 9    a Comprehensive Stroke center; 10        (5.10) a physician providing stroke care from a 11    Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Center, Thrombectomy Ready 12    Stroke Center, or Primary Stroke Center Plus; 13        (6) a physician providing stroke care from a Primary 14    Stroke Center;15        (7) a physician providing stroke care from an Acute 16    Stroke-Ready Hospital;17        (8) an EMS Coordinator;18        (9) an acute stroke patient advocate;19        (10) a fire chief, or designee, from an EMS Region 20    that serves a population of over 2,000,000 people;21        (11) a fire chief, or designee, from a rural EMS 22    Region;23        (12) a representative from a private ambulance 24    provider;25        (12.5) a representative from a municipal EMS provider; 26    and   HB5494 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1        (13) a representative from the State Emergency Medical 2    Services Advisory Council.3    (b) Of the members first appointed, 9 members shall be 4appointed for a term of one year, 9 members shall be appointed 5for a term of 2 years, and the remaining members shall be 6appointed for a term of 3 years. The terms of subsequent 7appointees shall be 3 years.8    (c) The State Stroke Advisory Subcommittee shall be 9provided a 90-day period in which to review and comment upon 10all rules proposed by the Department pursuant to this Act 11concerning stroke care, except for emergency rules adopted 12pursuant to Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative 13Procedure Act. The 90-day review and comment period shall 14commence prior to publication of the proposed rules and upon 15the Department's submission of the proposed rules to the 16individual Committee members, if the Committee is not meeting 17at the time the proposed rules are ready for Committee review. 18The Department shall give due consideration to any 19recommendations submitted by the members of the State Stroke 20Advisory Subcommittee and shall notify the Subcommittee in 21writing of any recommendations that are not taken. The 22Department shall retain such notices in accordance with the 23Department's policies. 24    (d) The State Stroke Advisory Subcommittee shall develop 25and submit an evidence-based statewide stroke assessment tool 26to clinically evaluate potential stroke patients to the   HB5494 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1Department for final approval. Upon approval, the Department 2shall disseminate the tool to all EMS Systems for adoption. 3The Director shall post the Department-approved stroke 4assessment tool on the Department's website. The State Stroke 5Advisory Subcommittee shall review the Department-approved 6stroke assessment tool at least annually to ensure its 7clinical relevancy and to make changes when clinically 8warranted.9    (d-5) Each EMS Regional Stroke Advisory Subcommittee shall 10submit recommendations for continuing education for 11pre-hospital personnel to that Region's EMS Medical Directors 12Committee. 13    (e) Nothing in this Section shall preclude the State 14Stroke Advisory Subcommittee from reviewing and commenting on 15proposed rules which fall under the purview of the State 16Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council. Nothing in this 17Section shall preclude the Emergency Medical Services Advisory 18Council from reviewing and commenting on proposed rules which 19fall under the purview of the State Stroke Advisory 20Subcommittee.21    (f) The Director shall coordinate with and assist the EMS 22System Medical Directors and Regional Stroke Advisory 23Subcommittee within each EMS Region to establish protocols 24related to the assessment, treatment, and transport of 25possible acute stroke patients by licensed emergency medical 26services providers. These protocols shall include regional   HB5494 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 20079 BAB 33530 b1transport plans for the triage and transport of possible acute 2stroke patients to the most appropriate Comprehensive Stroke 3Center, Thrombectomy Capable Stroke Center, Thrombectomy Ready 4Stroke Center, Primary Stroke Center Plus, Primary Stroke 5Center, or Acute Stroke-Ready Hospital, unless circumstances 6warrant otherwise.7(Source: P.A. 103-149, eff. 1-1-24.)